Illinois, session 104th, SB1343.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Central Management Services 5Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6changing Section 405-315 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 405/405-315)  (was 20 ILCS 405/67.24)8    Sec. 405-315. Management of State buildings and other real 9properties; security force; fees. 10    (a) To manage, operate, maintain, and preserve from waste 11the State buildings, facilities, structures, grounds, or other 12real properties, including, without limitation, the real 13properties property transferred to the Department under 14Section 405-415, including, without limitation, the State 15buildings listed below, and to grant easements and accept 16easements with respect to those properties, on such terms and 17conditions that in the judgment of the Director are in the best 18interests of the State. The Department may rent portions of 19these and other State buildings when in the judgment of the 20Director those leases or subleases will be in the best 21interests of the State. The leases or subleases shall not 22exceed 5 years unless a greater term is specifically 23authorized.  SB1343 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1    a. Peoria Regional Office Building 2        5415 North University 3        Peoria, Illinois  61614 4    b. Springfield Regional Office Building 5        4500 South 6th Street 6        Springfield, Illinois  62703 7    c. Champaign Regional Office Building 8        2125 South 1st Street 9        Champaign, Illinois  61820 10    d. Illinois State Armory Building 11        124 East Adams 12        Springfield, Illinois  62706 13    e. Marion Regional Office Building 14        2209 West Main Street 15        Marion, Illinois  62959 16    f. Kenneth Hall Regional State Office 17        Building 18        #10 Collinsville Avenue 19        East St. Louis, Illinois  62201 20    g. Rockford Regional Office Building 21        4402 North Main Street 22        P.O. Box 915 23        Rockford, Illinois  61105 24    h. State of Illinois Building 25        160 North LaSalle 26        Chicago, Illinois  60601 SB1343 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1    i. Office and Laboratory Building 2        2121 West Taylor Street 3        Chicago, Illinois  60602 4    j. Central Computer Facility 5        201 West Adams 6        Springfield, Illinois  62706 7    k. Elgin Office Building 8        595 South State Street 9        Elgin, Illinois  60120 10    l. (Blank). James R. Thompson Center 11        Bounded by Lake, Clark, Randolph and 12        LaSalle Streets 13        Chicago, Illinois 14    m. The following buildings located within the Chicago 15        Medical Center District: 16        1. Lawndale Day Care Center 17        2929 West 19th Street 18        2. Edwards Center 19        2020 Roosevelt Road 20        3. Illinois Center for 21        Rehabilitation and Education 22        1950 West Roosevelt Road and 1151 South Wood Street 23        4. Department of Children and 24        Family Services District Office 25        1026 South Damen 26        5. The William Heally School SB1343 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1        1731 West Taylor 2        6. Administrative Office Building 3        1100 South Paulina Street 4        7. Metro Children and Adolescents Center 5        1601 West Taylor Street 6    n. E.J. "Zeke" Giorgi Center 7        200 Wyman Street 8        Rockford, Illinois 9    o. Suburban North Facility 10        9511 Harrison 11        Des Plaines, Illinois 12    p. The following buildings located within the Revenue 13        Center in Springfield: 14        1. State Property Control Warehouse 15        11th & Ash 16        2. Illinois State Museum Research & Collections 17        Center 18        1011 East Ash Street 19    q. Effingham Regional Office Building 20        401 Industrial Drive 21        Effingham, Illinois 22    r. The Communications Center 23        120 West Jefferson 24        Springfield, Illinois 25    s. Portions or all of the basement and 26        ground floor of the SB1343 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1        State of Illinois Building 2        160 North LaSalle 3        Chicago, Illinois 60601 4    t. 115 South LaSalle Street, Chicago, Illinois 5may be leased or subleased to persons, firms, partnerships, 6associations, or individuals for terms not to exceed 15 years 7when in the judgment of the Director those leases or subleases 8will be in the best interests of the State.9    Portions or all of the commercial space, which includes 10the sub-basement, storage mezzanine, concourse, and ground and 11second floors of the12        James R. Thompson Center 13        Bounded by Lake, Clark, Randolph and LaSalle Streets 14        Chicago, Illinois15may be leased or subleased to persons, firms, partnerships, 16associations, or individuals for terms not to exceed 15 years 17subject to renewals when in the judgment of the Director those 18leases or subleases will be in the best interests of the State.19    The Director is authorized to rent portions of the above 20described facilities to persons, firms, partnerships, 21associations, or individuals for terms not to exceed 30 days 22when those leases or subleases will not interfere with State 23usage of the facility. This authority is meant to supplement 24and shall not in any way be interpreted to restrict the 25Director's ability to make portions of the State of Illinois 26Building and the James R. Thompson Center available for   SB1343 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1long-term commercial leases or subleases.2    Notwithstanding the provisions above, the Department of 3Children and Family Services and the Department of Human 4Services (as successor to the Department of Rehabilitation 5Services and the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 6Disabilities) shall determine the allocation of space for 7direct recipient care in their respective facilities. The 8Department of Central Management Services shall consult with 9the affected agency in the allocation and lease of surplus 10space in these facilities. Potential lease arrangements shall 11not endanger the direct recipient care responsibilities in 12these facilities.13    (b) To appoint, subject to the Personnel Code, persons to 14be members of a police and security force. Members of the 15security force shall be peace officers when performing duties 16pursuant to this Section and as such shall have all of the 17powers possessed by policemen in cities and sheriffs, 18including the power to make arrests on view or issue citations 19for violations of State statutes or city or county ordinances, 20except that in counties of more than 1,000,000 population, any 21powers created by this subsection shall be exercised only (i) 22when necessary to protect the property, personnel, or 23interests of the Department or any State agency for whom the 24Department manages, operates, or maintains property or (ii) 25when specifically requested by appropriate State or local law 26enforcement officials, and except that within counties of   SB1343 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b11,000,000 or less population, these powers shall be exercised 2only when necessary to protect the property, personnel, or 3interests of the State of Illinois and only while on property 4managed, operated, or maintained by the Department.5    Nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to 6make it conflict with any provisions of, or rules promulgated 7under, the Personnel Code.8    (c) To charge reasonable fees for the lease, rental, use, 9or occupancy of State facilities managed, operated, or 10maintained by the Department. All moneys collected under this 11Section shall be deposited in a revolving fund in the State 12treasury known as the Facilities Management Revolving Fund. 13    (d) (Blank). Provisions of this Section relating to the 14James R. Thompson Center are subject to the provisions of 15Section 7.4 of the State Property Control Act.16(Source: P.A. 93-19, eff. 6-20-03; 93-839, eff. 7-30-04; 1794-91, eff. 7-1-05.) 18    Section 10. The State Property Control Act is amended by 19changing Section 7.1 as follows: 20    (30 ILCS 605/7.1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 133b10.1)21    Sec. 7.1. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, all 22surplus real property held by the State of Illinois shall be 23disposed of by the administrator as provided in this Section. 24"Surplus real property," as used in this Section, means any   SB1343 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1real property to which the State holds fee simple title or 2lesser interest, and is vacant and determined by the head of 3the owning agency to no longer be required for the State 4agency's needs and responsibilities and has no foreseeable use 5by the owning agency. Title to the surplus real property may 6remain with the owning agency throughout the disposition 7process if approved by the Administrator; however, the 8Administrator and the Department of Central Management 9Services shall have sole responsibility and authority for 10disposing of the property as set out in this Section.11    (b) All responsible officers shall submit an Annual Real 12Property Utilization Report to the Administrator, or annual 13update of such report, on forms required by the Administrator, 14by August July 31 of each year. The Administrator may require 15such documentation as he deems reasonably necessary in 16connection with this Report, and shall require that such 17Report include the following information:18        (1) A legal description of all real property owned by 19    the State under the control of the responsible officer.20        (2) A description of the use of the real property 21    listed under (1).22        (3) A list of any improvements made to such real 23    property during the previous year.24        (4) The dates on which the State first acquired its 25    interest in such real property, and the purchase price and 26    source of the funds used to acquire the property.  SB1343 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1        (5) Plans for the future use of currently unused real 2    property.3        (6) A declaration of any surplus real property. On or 4    before October 31 of each year the Administrator shall 5    furnish copies of each responsible officer's report along 6    with a list of surplus property indexed by legislative 7    district to the General Assembly.8    This report shall be filed with the Speaker, the Minority 9Leader and the Clerk of the House of Representatives and the 10President, the Minority Leader and the Secretary of the Senate 11and shall be duplicated and made available to the members of 12the General Assembly for evaluation by such members for 13possible liquidation of unused public property at public sale.14    (c) Following receipt of the Annual Real Property 15Utilization Report required under paragraph (b), the 16Administrator shall notify all State agencies by October 31 of 17all declared surplus real property.18    (d) Any surplus real property shall be disposed of by the 19Administrator. No appraisal is required if during his initial 20survey of surplus real property the Administrator determines 21such property has a fair market value of less than $5,000. If 22the value of such property is determined by the Administrator 23in his initial survey to be $5,000 or more, then the 24Administrator shall obtain 2 appraisals of such real property, 25which shall include known liabilities, including, but not 26limited to, environmental costs. The average of these 2   SB1343 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1appraisals shall represent the fair market value of the 2surplus real property. 3    No surplus real property may be conveyed by the 4Administrator for less than the fair market value, unless the 5Administrator makes a written determination that it is in the 6best interests of the State to establish a different value. 7That written determination shall be published in the Illinois 8Procurement Bulletin. Such written determination, along with 9an affidavit setting forth the conditions and circumstances 10that make the use of a different value in the best interests of 11the State, shall also be filed with the Executive Ethics 12Commission. The Executive Ethics Commission shall have 30 days 13to review the written determination. The Executive Ethics 14Commission may order an additional 30 days to review the 15written determination. The Administrator shall provide the 16Executive Ethics Commission with any information requested by 17the Executive Ethics Commission related to the Administrator's 18determination of the value of the surplus real property. If 19the Executive Ethics Commission objects in writing to the 20value determined by the Administrator, then the Administrator 21shall not convey the surplus real property for less than 22either the fair market value as determined by the average of 23appraisals or an amount agreed upon by the Executive Ethics 24Commission and the Administrator. Circumstances in which it is 25in the best interests of the State to establish a different 26value may include, but are not limited to, the following: (i)   SB1343 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1an auction did not yield any bids at the established fair 2market value; (ii) a unit of local government is interested in 3acquiring the surplus real property; or (iii) the costs to the 4State of maintaining such surplus real property are 5sufficiently high that it would be reasonable to a prudent 6person to sell such surplus real property for less than the 7fair market value established by the average of the 8appraisals. In no event shall the Administrator sell surplus 9real property for less than 75% of fair market value and before 10such property has been offered to an interested unit of local 11government or made available at public auction. 12    Prior to offering the surplus real property for sale to 13the public the Administrator shall give notice in writing of 14the existence of the surplus real property to each State 15agency and to the governing bodies of the county and of all 16cities, villages and incorporated towns in the county in which 17such real property is located. Any such State agency or 18governing body may notify the Administrator of its interest in 19acquiring the surplus real property within a notice period set 20by the Administrator of at least 30 days. If any State agency 21notifies the Administrator of its interest in acquiring the 22surplus property, the Administrator may deny any such requests 23by such agency if the Administrator determines that it is more 24advantageous to the State to dispose of the surplus real 25property to a governing body or the public. If a governing body 26notifies the Administrator of its interest in acquiring the   SB1343 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1property, then the Administrator shall wait a minimum of 30 2additional days during which the Administrator may engage in 3negotiations with such governing body for the sale of the 4surplus real property. After the notice period set by the 5Administrator of at least 30 days has passed, the 6Administrator may sell the surplus real property by public 7auction, which may include an electronic auction or the use of 8sealed bids, following notice of such sale by publication on 3 9separate days not less than 15 nor more than 30 days prior to 10the sale in the State newspaper and in a newspaper having 11general circulation in the county in which the surplus real 12property is located. The Administrator shall post "For Sale" 13signs of a conspicuous nature on such surplus real property 14offered for sale to the public. If no acceptable offers for the 15surplus real property are received, the Administrator may have 16new appraisals of such property made. The Administrator shall 17have all power necessary to convey surplus real property under 18this Section. All moneys received for the sale of surplus real 19property shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund, 20except that: 21        (1) Where moneys expended for the acquisition of such 22    real property were from a special fund which is still a 23    special fund in the State treasury, this special fund 24    shall be reimbursed in the amount of the original 25    expenditure and any amount in excess thereof shall be 26    deposited in the General Revenue Fund.  SB1343 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06300 BDA 16335 b1        (2) Whenever a State mental health facility operated 2    by the Department of Human Services is closed and the real 3    estate on which the facility is located is sold by the 4    State, the net proceeds of the sale of the real estate 5    shall be deposited into the Community Mental Health 6    Medicaid Trust Fund.7        (3) Whenever a State developmental disabilities 8    facility operated by the Department of Human Services is 9    closed and the real estate on which the facility is 10    located is sold by the State, the net proceeds of the sale 11    of the real estate shall be deposited into the Community 12    Developmental Disability Services Medicaid Trust Fund. 13    The Administrator shall have authority to order such 14surveys, abstracts of title, or commitments for title 15insurance as may, in his reasonable discretion, be deemed 16necessary to demonstrate to prospective purchasers or bidders 17good and marketable title in any property offered for sale 18pursuant to this Section. Unless otherwise specifically 19authorized by the General Assembly, all conveyances of 20property made by the Administrator shall be by quit claim 21deed.22    (e) The Administrator shall submit an annual report on or 23before February 1 to the Governor and the General Assembly 24containing a detailed statement of surplus real property 25either transferred or conveyed under this Section.26(Source: P.A. 102-280, eff. 8-6-21.)